District of Columbia statutes.
5-132.03

Training for school security personnel.

The School Safety Division shall develop a training curriculum for all school security personnel providing security for DCPS. The curriculum shall be focused on training supervisory and on-site personnel so that they will provide appropriate security procedures for the various socioeconomic conditions at each educational facility. The curriculum shall include training in the following areas:

(1)

Child development;

(2)

Effective communication skills;

(3)

Behavior management;

(4)

Conflict resolution;

(5)

Substance abuse and its effect on youth;

(6)

Availability of social services for youth;

(7)

District of Columbia laws and regulations, including Board of Education regulations;

(8)

Constitutional standards for searches and seizures conducted by school security personnel on school grounds; and

(9)

Gang and crew violence prevention.

Apr. 13, 2005, D.C. Law 15-350, § 103, 52 DCR 2005
Mar. 21, 2009, D.C. Law 17-320, § 2(c), 56 DCR 219
This section is referenced in § 5-132.06.
D.C. Law 17-320, in par. (7), deleted “and” from the end; in par. (8), substituted “ground; and” for “ground.”; and added par. (9).
For temporary (225 day) addition, see § 4 of School Safety and Security Contracting Procedures Temporary Amendment Act of 2004 (D.C. Law 15-318, April 8, 2005, law notification 52 DCR 4707).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 4 of Metropolitan Police Department School Safety and Security Emergency Act of 2004 (D.C. Act 15-496, August 2, 2004, 51 DCR 8797).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 4 of School Safety and Security Contracting Procedures Emergency Act of 2004 (D.C. Act 15-596, November 30, 2004, 51 DCR 11219).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 4 of School Safety and Security Contracting Procedures Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2005 (D.C. Act 16-3, January 19, 2005, 52 DCR 2675).